Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.120

Specific penalties invoked.

The provisions of RCW 9.24.050, 9.24.040 and 9.24.030 shall apply to the corporations authorized under this title.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.04.120. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 50; RRS s 3379.]